Alaska statutes. Title 9. Code of Civil Procedure.
Article 1. Evidence and Presumptions.

Sec. 09.25.010.
Statute of frauds.

In the following cases and under the following conditions an agreement, promise, or undertaking is unenforceable unless it or some note or memorandum of it is in writing and subscribed by the party charged or by an agent of that party:

an agreement that by its terms is not to be performed within a year from the making of it;

an agreement the performance of which is not to be completed by the end of a lifetime; this provision includes a contract to bequeath property or make a testamentary disposition of any kind, a contract to assign or an assignment, with or without consideration to the promisor, of a life or health or accident insurance policy, or a promise, with or without consideration to the promisor, to name a beneficiary of that type of policy; but this provision does not include an insurer’s promise to issue a policy of insurance, or any promise or assignment with respect to a policy of industrial life or health or accident insurance;

a special promise to answer for the debt of another;

an agreement by an executor or administrator to pay the debts of the testator or intestate out of the personal estate of the executor or administrator;

an agreement made upon consideration of marriage other than mutual promises to marry;

an agreement for leasing for a longer period than one year, or for the sale of real property, or of any interest in real property, or to charge or encumber real property;

an agreement concerning real property made by an agent of the party sought to be charged unless the authority of the agent is in writing;

an agreement authorizing or employing an agent or broker to sell or purchase real estate for compensation or commission; however, if the note or memorandum of the agreement is in writing, subscribed by the party to be charged or by a lawfully authorized agent, contains a description of the property sufficient for identification, authorizes or employs the agent or broker named in it to sell the property, and expresses with reasonable certainty the amount of the commission or compensation to be paid the agent or broker, the agreement of authorization or employment is not unenforceable for failure to state a consideration;

an agreement to establish a trust;

a subsequent or new promise to pay a debt discharged in bankruptcy;

a conveyance or assignment of a trust in personal property;

an agreement to pay compensation for services rendered in negotiating a loan, effecting the procurement of a business opportunity, or the purchase and sale of a business, its good will, inventory, fixtures, or an interest in it, including a majority of the voting stock interest in a corporation and including the creating of a partnership interest, other than an agreement to pay compensation to an auctioneer or an attorney at law;

an agreement to lend more than $50,000 or to grant or extend credit of more than $50,000, if the loan or grant or extension of credit is not primarily for personal, family, or household purposes and if the person who agrees to lend or grant or extend credit is engaged in the business of lending or arranging for the lending of money or the granting or extension of credit; in this paragraph a loan secured solely by residential property consisting of one to four dwelling units is considered to be a loan primarily for personal, family, or household purposes.

No estate or interest in real property, other than a lease for a term not exceeding one year, nor any trust or power concerning the property may be created, transferred, or declared, otherwise than by operation of law, or by a conveyance or other instrument in writing subscribed by the party creating, transferring, or declaring it or by that party’s agent under written authority and executed with the formalities that are required by law. If the estate or interest in real property is created, transferred, or declared to a nonresident alien or for the benefit of a nonresident alien, the instrument shall so state and shall contain the name and address of the alien. This subsection does not affect the power of a testator in the disposition of real property by will, nor prevent a trust’s arising or being extinguished by implication or operation of law, nor affect the power of a court to compel specific performance of an agreement in relation to the property.

History.

(§ 3.11 ch 101 SLA 1962; am § 1 ch 145 SLA 1975; am § 1 ch 31 SLA 1989)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1994, the second occurrence of “lend” in (a)(13) of this section was substituted for “loan” to correct a manifest error in ch. 31, SLA 1989.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 2, ch. 31, SLA 1989 provides that (a)(13) of this section “applies to an agreement that is entered into on or after January 1, 1990.”

Sec. 09.25.020.
Exceptions to statute of frauds.

A contract, promise, or agreement that is subject to AS

09.25.010

, that does not satisfy the requirements of that section, but that is otherwise valid is enforceable if

there has been full performance on one side accepted by the other in accordance with the contract;

there is a memorandum that would satisfy the requirements of AS

09.25.010

except for error or omission in the recital of past events;

there is a memorandum that would satisfy the requirements of AS

09.25.010

except for error or omission that could be corrected by reformation if it occurred in a formal contract;

the party against whom enforcement is sought admits, voluntarily or involuntarily, in pleadings or at any other stage of this or any other action or proceeding the making of an agreement; or

it is a contract of employment for a period not exceeding one year from the commencement of work under its terms.

History.

(§ 3.12 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.25.030.
Representations as to credit, skill, or character of a third person.

Evidence is not admissible to charge a person upon a representation as to the credit, skill, or character of a third person unless the representation or some memorandum of it is in writing, and either subscribed by or in the handwriting of the party to be charged.

History.

(§ 3.13 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1994, “Evidence is not” was substituted for “No evidence is” to conform the section to the current style of the Alaska Statutes.

Sec. 09.25.040.
Rules for construing real estate descriptions.

The following are the rules for construing the descriptive part of a conveyance of real property when the construction is doubtful and there are no other sufficient circumstances to determine it:

where there are certain definite and ascertained particulars in the description, the addition of others which are indefinite, unknown, or false does not frustrate the conveyance, but it is to be construed by those particulars if they constitute a sufficient description to ascertain its application:

when permanent and visible or ascertained boundaries or monuments are inconsistent with the measurement, either of lines, angles, or surfaces, the boundaries or monuments are paramount:

between different measurements which are inconsistent with each other, that of angles is paramount to that of surfaces, and that of lines paramount to both:

when a road or stream of water not navigable is the boundary, the rights of the grantor to the middle of the road or the thread of the stream are included in the conveyance, except where the road or bed of the stream is held under another title:

when tidewater is the boundary, the rights of the grantor to low-water mark are included in the conveyance:

when the description refers to a map and that reference is inconsistent with other particulars, it controls them if it appears that the parties acted with reference to the map; otherwise the map is subordinate to other definite and ascertained particulars.

History.

(§ 3.14 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.25.050.
[Renumbered as AS 09.45.052.]

Sec. 09.25.051.
Admissibility of DNA profiles.

In a civil action or proceeding, evidence of a DNA profile is admissible to prove or disprove any relevant fact if the court finds that the technique underlying the evidence is scientifically valid. The admission of the DNA profile does not require a finding of general acceptance in the relevant scientific community of DNA profile evidence.

In this section,

“deoxyribonucleic acid” means the molecules in all cellular forms that contain genetic information in a patterned chemical structure for each individual;

“DNA profile”

means an analysis of blood, semen, tissue, or other cells bearing deoxyribonucleic acid resulting in the identification of the individual’s patterned chemical structure of genetic information;

includes statistical population frequency comparisons of the patterned chemical structures described in (A) of this paragraph.

History.

(§ 1 ch 7 SLA 1995)

Cross references. —

For effect of this section on the Alaska Rules of Evidence, see § 3, ch. 7, SLA 1995 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 09.25.060.
Fraud presumed from retention of possession.

Every sale or assignment of personal property unless accompanied by the immediate delivery and the actual and continued change of possession of the thing sold or assigned is presumed prima facie to be a fraud against the creditors of the vendor or assignor, and subsequent purchasers in good faith and for a valuable consideration during the time the property remains in the possession of the vendor or assignor, except that retention of possession in good faith and current course of trade by a merchant seller for a commercially reasonable time after a sale or identification is not fraudulent, and nothing contained in this section shall supersede the provisions of AS 45.01 — AS 45.08, AS 45.12, AS 45.14, and AS 45.29 (Uniform Commercial Code).

History.

(§ 3.16 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1993, under § 13, ch. 34, SLA 1993 and § 128, ch. 35, SLA 1993 the citation to the Uniform Commercial Code was revised.

In 2000, “AS 45.01 - AS 45.08, AS 45.12, AS 45.14, and AS 45.29” was substituted for “AS 45.01 — AS
45.09, AS 45.12, and AS 45.14” in accordance with § 35, ch. 113, SLA 2000.

Sec. 09.25.070.
Evidence of publication.

Evidence of the publication of a document or notice required by law to be published in a newspaper may be given by the affidavit of the printer, foreman, or business manager of the newspaper, annexed to a copy of the document or notice, specifying the times when and the paper in which the publication was made.

History.

(§ 3.17 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Cross references. —

For court rules on proof of service, see Civ.
R. 4(e) and 5.

Sec. 09.25.080.
Right to receipt upon payment or delivery.

A person who pays money or delivers an instrument or property is entitled to a receipt for it from the person to whom the payment or delivery is made, and may demand a proper signature to the receipt as a condition of the payment or delivery.

History.

(§ 3.19 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.25.090.
Objections to tender.

The person to whom a tender is made shall at the time specify any objection the person may have to the money, instrument, or property, or the person waives it.
If the objection is to the amount of money, the terms of the instrument, or the amount or kind of property, the person shall specify the amount, terms, or kind that the person requires, or is precluded from objecting later.
This section may not be construed to modify or change in any manner corresponding provisions of AS 45.01 — AS 45.08, AS 45.12, AS 45.14, and AS 45.29 (Uniform Commercial Code).

History.

(§ 3.20 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1993, under § 13, ch. 34, SLA 1993 and § 128, ch. 35, SLA 1993 the citation to the Uniform Commercial Code was revised.

In 2000, “AS 45.01 — AS 45.08, AS 45.12, AS 45.14, and AS 45.29” was substituted for “AS 45.01 — AS
45.09, AS 45.12, and AS 45.14” in accordance with § 35, ch. 113, SLA 2000.

Sec. 09.25.095.
Effect of private seals and scrolls.

Private seals and scrolls as a substitute for seals are abolished.
They are not required to an instrument, but when used their effect remains unchanged.

History.

(§ 3.10 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

09.25.130

. Renumbered in 1994.

Secs. 09.25.100 — 09.25.125.
[Renumbered as AS 40.25.110 — 40.25.125.]

Sec. 09.25.130.
[Renumbered as AS 09.25.095.]

Sec. 09.25.140.
[Renumbered as AS 40.25.140.]

Sec. 09.25.150.
[Renumbered as AS 09.25.300.]

Sec. 09.25.160.
[Renumbered as AS 09.25.310.]

Sec. 09.25.170.
[Renumbered as AS 09.25.320.]

Sec. 09.25.180.
[Renumbered as AS 09.25.330.]

Sec. 09.25.190.
[Renumbered as AS 09.25.340.]

Sec. 09.25.200.
[Renumbered as AS 09.25.350.]

Sec. 09.25.210.
[Renumbered as AS 09.25.360.]

Sec. 09.25.220.
[Renumbered as AS 40.25.220.]

Sec. 09.25.230.
[Renumbered as AS 09.25.400.]